vim/st.aff
FLAG long
SFX iJ Y 43
SFX iJ dormir dormir/ dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormant/ dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormi/ dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormis/ dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormie/ dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormies/ dormir
SFX iJ dormir dors/ dormir
SFX iJ dormir dort/ dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormons/ dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormez/ dormir
SFX iJ dormir dorment/ dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormais/ dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormait/ dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormions/ dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormiez/ dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormaient/ dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormis/ dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormit/ dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormîmes/ dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormîtes/ dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormirent/ dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormirai/ dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormiras/ dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormira/ dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormirons/ dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormirez/ dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormiront/ dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormirais/ dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormirait/ dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormirions/ dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormiriez/ dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormiraient/ dormir
SFX iJ dormir dorme/ dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormes/ dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormisse/ dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormisses/ dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormît/ dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormissions/ dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormissiez/ dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormissent/ dormir
SFX iJ dormir dors/ dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormons/ dormir
SFX iJ dormir dormez/ dormir

SFX iK Y 42
SFX iK quérir quérir/ quérir
SFX iK quérir quérant/ quérir
SFX iK quérir quis/ quérir
SFX iK quérir quise/ quérir
SFX iK quérir quises/ quérir
SFX iK quérir quiers/ quérir
SFX iK quérir quiert/ quérir
SFX iK quérir quérons/ quérir
SFX iK quérir quérez/ quérir
SFX iK quérir quièrent/ quérir
SFX iK quérir quérais/ quérir
SFX iK quérir quérait/ quérir
SFX iK quérir quérions/ quérir
SFX iK quérir quériez/ quérir
SFX iK quérir quéraient/ quérir
SFX iK quérir quis/ quérir
SFX iK quérir quit/ quérir
SFX iK quérir quîmes/ quérir
SFX iK quérir quîtes/ quérir
SFX iK quérir quirent/ quérir
SFX iK quérir querrai/ quérir
SFX iK quérir querras/ quérir
SFX iK quérir querra/ quérir
SFX iK quérir querrons/ quérir
SFX iK quérir querrez/ quérir
SFX iK quérir querront/ quérir
SFX iK quérir querrais/ quérir
SFX iK quérir querrait/ quérir
SFX iK quérir querrions/ quérir
SFX iK quérir querriez/ quérir
SFX iK quérir querraient/ quérir
SFX iK quérir quière/ quérir
SFX iK quérir quières/ quérir
SFX iK quérir quisse/ quérir
SFX iK quérir quisses/ quérir
SFX iK quérir quît/ quérir
SFX iK quérir quissions/ quérir
SFX iK quérir quissiez/ quérir
SFX iK quérir quissent/ quérir
SFX iK quérir quiers/ quérir
SFX iK quérir quérons/ quérir
SFX iK quérir quérez/ quérir

SFX iM Y 42
SFX iM quérir quérir/ quérir
SFX iM quérir quérant/ quérir
SFX iM quérir quis/ quérir
SFX iM quérir quise/ quérir
SFX iM quérir quises/ quérir
SFX iM quérir quiers/ quérir
SFX iM quérir quiert/ quérir
SFX iM quérir quérons/ quérir
SFX iM quérir quérez/ quérir
SFX iM quérir quièrent/ quérir
SFX iM quérir quérais/ quérir
SFX iM quérir quérait/ quérir
SFX iM quérir quérions/ quérir
SFX iM quérir quériez/ quérir
SFX iM quérir quéraient/ quérir
SFX iM quérir quis/ quérir
SFX iM quérir quit/ quérir
SFX iM quérir quîmes/ quérir
SFX iM quérir quîtes/ quérir
SFX iM quérir quirent/ quérir
SFX iM quérir querrai/ quérir
SFX iM quérir querras/ quérir
SFX iM quérir querra/ quérir
SFX iM quérir querrons/ quérir
SFX iM quérir querrez/ quérir
SFX iM quérir querront/ quérir
SFX iM quérir querrais/ quérir
SFX iM quérir querrait/ quérir
SFX iM quérir querrions/ quérir
SFX iM quérir querriez/ quérir
SFX iM quérir querraient/ quérir
SFX iM quérir quière/ quérir
SFX iM quérir quières/ quérir
SFX iM quérir quisse/ quérir
SFX iM quérir quisses/ quérir
SFX iM quérir quît/ quérir
SFX iM quérir quissions/ quérir
SFX iM quérir quissiez/ quérir
SFX iM quérir quissent/ quérir
SFX iM quérir quiers/ quérir
SFX iM quérir quérons/ quérir
SFX iM quérir quérez/ quérir

SFX iN Y 41
SFX iN uir uir/ fuir
SFX iN uir uyant/ fuir
SFX iN uir ui/ fuir
SFX iN uir uis/ fuir
SFX iN uir uie/ fuir
SFX iN uir uies/ fuir
SFX iN uir uis/ fuir
SFX iN uir uit/ fuir
SFX iN uir uyons/ fuir
SFX iN uir uyez/ fuir
SFX iN uir uient/ fuir
SFX iN uir uyais/ fuir
SFX iN uir uyait/ fuir
SFX iN uir uyions/ fuir
SFX iN uir uyiez/ fuir
SFX iN uir uyaient/ fuir
SFX iN uir uîmes/ fuir
SFX iN uir uîtes/ fuir
SFX iN uir uirent/ fuir
SFX iN uir uirai/ fuir
SFX iN uir uiras/ fuir
SFX iN uir uira/ fuir
SFX iN uir uirons/ fuir
SFX iN uir uirez/ fuir
SFX iN uir uiront/ fuir
SFX iN uir uirais/ fuir
SFX iN uir uirait/ fuir
SFX iN uir uirions/ fuir
SFX iN uir uiriez/ fuir
SFX iN uir uiraient/ fuir
SFX iN uir uie/ fuir
SFX iN uir uies/ fuir
SFX iN uir uisse/ fuir
SFX iN uir uisses/ fuir
SFX iN uir uît/ fuir
SFX iN uir uissions/ fuir
SFX iN uir uissiez/ fuir
SFX iN uir uissent/ fuir
SFX iN uir uis/ fuir
SFX iN uir uyons/ fuir
SFX iN uir uyez/ fuir

SFX iO Y 41
SFX iO fuir fuir/ enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuyant/ enfuir
SFX iO fuir fui/ enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuis/ enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuie/ enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuies/ enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuis/ enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuit/ enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuyons/ enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuyez/ enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuient/ enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuyais/ enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuyait/ enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuyions/ enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuyiez/ enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuyaient/ enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuîmes/ enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuîtes/ enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuirent/ enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuirai/ enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuiras/ enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuira/ enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuirons/ enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuirez/ enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuiront/ enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuirais/ enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuirait/ enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuirions/ enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuiriez/ enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuiraient/ enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuie/ enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuies/ enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuisse/ enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuisses/ enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuît/ enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuissions/ enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuissiez/ enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuissent/ enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuis/ enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuyons/ enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuyez/ enfuir

SFX iP Y 43
SFX iP ourir ourir/ mourir
SFX iP ourir ourant/ mourir
SFX iP ourir ort/ mourir
SFX iP ourir orts/ mourir
SFX iP ourir orte/ mourir
SFX iP ourir ortes/ mourir
SFX iP ourir eurs/ mourir
SFX iP ourir eurt/ mourir
SFX iP ourir ourons/ mourir
SFX iP ourir ourez/ mourir
SFX iP ourir eurent/ mourir
SFX iP ourir ourais/ mourir
SFX iP ourir ourait/ mourir
SFX iP ourir ourions/ mourir
SFX iP ourir ouriez/ mourir
SFX iP ourir ouraient/ mourir
SFX iP ourir ourus/ mourir
SFX iP ourir ourut/ mourir
SFX iP ourir ourûmes/ mourir
SFX iP ourir ourûtes/ mourir
SFX iP ourir oururent/ mourir
SFX iP ourir ourrai/ mourir
SFX iP ourir ourras/ mourir
SFX iP ourir ourra/ mourir
SFX iP ourir ourrons/ mourir
SFX iP ourir ourrez/ mourir
SFX iP ourir ourront/ mourir
SFX iP ourir ourrais/ mourir
SFX iP ourir ourrait/ mourir
SFX iP ourir ourrions/ mourir
SFX iP ourir ourriez/ mourir
SFX iP ourir ourraient/ mourir
SFX iP ourir eure/ mourir
SFX iP ourir eures/ mourir
SFX iP ourir ourusse/ mourir
SFX iP ourir ourusses/ mourir
SFX iP ourir ourût/ mourir
SFX iP ourir ourussions/ mourir
SFX iP ourir ourussiez/ mourir
SFX iP ourir ourussent/ mourir
SFX iP ourir eurs/ mourir
SFX iP ourir ourons/ mourir
SFX iP ourir ourez/ mourir
